Washington statutes.
RCW 26.33.903

Construction—Religious or nonprofit organizations.

Nothing contained in chapter 3, Laws of 2012 shall be construed to alter or affect existing law regarding the manner in which a religious or nonprofit organization may be licensed to and provide adoption, foster care, or other child-placing services under this chapter or chapter 74.15 or 74.13 RCW.

[ 2012 c 3 s 14 (Referendum Measure No. 74, approved November 6, 2012).]

NOTES:

Notice—2012 c 3: See note following RCW 26.04.010.